New Jersey, session 222, S151.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The board of education of a public school district and the governing board or chief school administrator of a nonpublic school shall require that each student enrolled in grades six through 12 have a physical examination using the Preparticipation Physical Evaluation form developed pursuant to subsection a. of section 2 of P.L.2013, c.71 (C.18A:40-41.7).  The licensed physician, advanced practice nurse, or physician assistant who performs the physical examination shall sign the forms certification statement attesting to the completion of the professional development module developed pursuant to subsection a. of section 3 of P.L.2013, c.71 (C.18A:40-41d).  The board of education of a public school district and the governing board or chief school administrator of a nonpublic school shall retain the original signed statement to attest to the qualifications of the health care practitioner to perform the physical examination required pursuant to this subsection. b.    A student enrolled in grades six through 12 who participates on a school-sponsored interscholastic or intramural athletic team or squad shall satisfy the requirements of subsection a. of this section in accordance with the provisions of the Scholastic Student-Athlete Safety Act, P.L.2013, c.71 (C.18A:40-41.6 et seq.). 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall first be applicable to the 2023-2024 school year.